Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
A. Effective July 1, 2026, each state employee who was in full-
time status as of June 30, 2019, and who is working in the same
position as of July 1, 2026, and who has not received an increase in
salary since June 30, 2019, shall receive a salary increase of five
percent (5%).
B. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to
any person employed by the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher
Education or employed by any college or university within The
Oklahoma State System of Higher Education.

Req. No. 14079 Page 1

C. The provisions of this section shall not be applicable to
any person employed by a common school district.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-14079 MAH 01/06/26















Req. No. 14079 Page 2